Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 2. HUMAN SERVICES AND PROTECTIVE SERVICES IN GENERAL

SUBTITLE C. ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS

CHAPTER 34. STATE TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE AND SUPPORT SERVICES PROGRAM

Sec. 34.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Related support services" means services considered under federal law to be a component of money payments for purposes of the financial assistance program authorized by Chapter 31.

(2) "Temporary assistance" means money payments for needy persons authorized by this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1440, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 34.002. DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF STATE PROGRAM; FUNDING. (a) The Health and Human Services Commission and the Texas Workforce Commission, with the participation of local workforce development boards, shall jointly develop and implement a state program of temporary assistance and related support services that is distinct from the financial assistance program authorized by Chapter 31.

(b) Temporary assistance and related support services may be provided under the state program only to:

(1) two-parent families; or

(2) persons residing in minimum service counties, as defined by the Texas Workforce Commission.

(c) Temporary assistance and related support services provided under the state program may not be funded with federal money provided to the state for the financial assistance program authorized by Chapter 31.

(d) If federal law is enacted that imposes work participation rate requirements on two-parent families for purposes of the financial assistance program under Chapter 31 that are substantively identical to those that federal law imposes on one-parent families for purposes of that program, the Health and Human Services Commission may, on the effective date of the federal law relating to the work participation rate requirements for two-parent families, provide for establishment of that recipient's eligibility for financial assistance under Chapter 31 instead of under this chapter in a manner that avoids disruption of benefits for which the recipient is eligible.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1440, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1134, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.167, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 34.003. RULES. (a) The executive commissioner and the Texas Workforce Commission shall adopt all rules necessary for implementation of the state program, including rules regarding eligibility, work requirements, work exemptions, time limits, and related support services.

(b) The rules must be designed to result in a state program that is substantively identical to the financial assistance program authorized by Chapter 31, except to the extent that programmatic differences are appropriate because of the populations served by those programs and the sources of funding for those programs.

(c) The Health and Human Services Commission and the Texas Workforce Commission shall form an interagency work group to develop the rules required under this section. The interagency work group shall provide for participation in development of the rules by representatives of local workforce development boards.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1440, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.168, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 34.004. PROCEDURES APPLICABLE TO PERSONS RESIDING IN MINIMUM SERVICE COUNTIES. The Health and Human Services Commission and the Texas Workforce Commission shall develop and implement procedures to:

(1) determine the date on which a person's eligibility for temporary assistance and related support services based on residency in a minimum service county, as defined by the Texas Workforce Commission, will cease as a result of the county's reclassification; and

(2) provide for establishment of that person's eligibility for financial assistance and related support services under Chapter 31 in a manner that avoids disruption of benefits for which the person is eligible.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1440, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.169, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 34.005. ELIGIBILITY FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE. A recipient of temporary assistance and related support services under the state program is eligible for medical assistance under Chapter 32 in the same manner as a person receiving financial assistance under Chapter 31.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1440, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 34.006. STUDY. The Texas Workforce Commission, in collaboration with local workforce development boards and the appropriate standing committees of the senate and house of representatives, shall:

(1) study methods to improve the delivery of workforce services to persons residing in minimum service counties, as defined by the Texas Workforce Commission; and

(2) develop recommendations to improve the delivery of services described by Subdivision (1).

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1440, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (S.B. 71), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 18, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.170, eff. April 2, 2015.